Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1609
Act; how construed.

The Self-Service Storage Facilities Act does not impair the power of the parties to a rental agreement to create rights, duties, or obligations that do not arise from the act. The rights provided to an operator by the act are in addition to all other rights provided by law to a creditor against a debtor.

Laws 2017, LB492, § 9.